Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.170

Correction by court of unconfirmed award.

(1) On motion of a party made not later than ninety days after an arbitrator gives notice under RCW 26.14.140(1) of an award, including an award corrected under RCW 26.14.160, the court shall correct the award if:

(a) The award has an evident mathematical miscalculation or an evident mistake in the description of a person, thing, or property;

(b) The award is imperfect in a matter of form not affecting the merits of the issues submitted; or

(c) The arbitrator made an award on a dispute not submitted to the arbitrator and the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the issues submitted.

(2) A motion under this section to correct an award may be joined with a motion to vacate or amend the award under RCW 26.14.180.

(3) Unless a motion under RCW 26.14.180 is pending, the court may confirm a corrected award under RCW 26.14.150.

[ 2023 c 61 s 18.]